Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Conduct of Elections

125.005.
Basic
provisions for elections. [Repealed.]

125.010.
Use
of voting machines authorized. [Repealed.]

125.013.
Hours
of voting; time off to vote. [Repealed.]

125.017.
Establishment
of voting place. [Repealed.]

125.020.
Use
of voting machines. [Repealed.]

125.030.
Power
to select make of machine. [Repealed.]

125.040.
Specifications
machines must comply with. [Repealed.]

125.050.
Custody
of machines. [Repealed.]

125.060.
Preparation
of ballot labels, special paper ballots. [Repealed.]

125.070.
Placing
ballot labels in machines. [Repealed.]

125.080.
Examination
of machines by county board — Delivery of keys — New ballot labels
in case of vacancy in candidacy. [Repealed.]

125.090.
Instruction
cards. [Repealed.]

125.100.
Instructions
of election officers. [Repealed.]

125.110.
Delivery
of machines to precincts — Arrangement in voting room. [Repealed.]

125.120.
Examination
of machine by election officers — Correction of defects — Substitute
machines. [Repealed.]

125.130.
Procedure
when machine in disrepair. [Repealed.]

125.132.
Voter’s
signature. [Repealed.]

125.135.
Maintenance
of order in voting room; electioneering prohibited. [Repealed.]

125.137.
Procedure
when voter’s right to vote is disputed. [Repealed.]

125.140.
Instruction
of voters — Assistance of physically disabled — Manner of voting.
[Repealed.]

125.150.
Counting
and certification of votes — Return of keys and machines. [Repealed.]

125.160.
Form
of return sheets and statements; delivery. [Repealed.]

125.170.
Period
machines to remain locked; custody of keys. [Repealed.]

125.180.
Number
of voters in precincts where machines are used. [Repealed.]

125.190.
Recanvass
of votes — Test of machine. [Repealed.]

125.200.
General
election laws apply. [Repealed.]

125.210.
Appointment
of challengers. [Repealed.]

125.220.
Absent
voting by disabled person. [Repealed.]

125.230.
Application
for absent ballot by voter expecting to be absent on election day. [Repealed.]

125.240.
Marking
absent ballot. [Repealed.]

125.250.
Counting
absent ballots. [Repealed.]

125.260.
Cost
of elections — Payment. [Repealed.]